Washington statutes.
RCW 38.32.090

Penalty for physician making false certificate.

Any physician who shall knowingly make and deliver a false certificate of physical disability concerning any member of the militia who shall have been ordered out or summoned for active service is guilty of perjury under chapter 9A.72 RCW and, upon conviction, as an additional penalty, shall forfeit forever his or her license and right to practice in this state.

[ 2003 c 53 s 209; 1989 c 19 s 43; 1943 c 130 s 11; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 8603-11. Prior: 1909 c 134 s 22.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.